Texas, session 891, SB49.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN; CAMP STAFF AND VOLUNTEER TRAINING; CAMPER SAFETY DRILLS.  (a)  A youth camp operator shall: (1)  develop and implement a written emergency operations plan with procedures for responding to an emergency event, including a weather or other disaster, serious accident, epidemic, or fatality; and (2)  annually review and as necessary update the plan. (b)  The emergency operations plan must include specific procedures for campers, camp staff, and camp volunteers to follow in an emergency event, including procedures for emergency shelter in or evacuation from camp buildings and the camp.  The department may prescribe additional procedures to be addressed in the plan. (c)  A youth camp operator shall conspicuously post the camp's emergency operations plan in: (1)  the camp's on-site administrative building; and (2)  each building occupied or used by campers, camp staff, or camp volunteers. (d)  Before the beginning of each camp session, a youth camp operator shall: (1)  provide to each camp staff member or volunteer comprehensive training on the camp's emergency operations plan, that: (A)  covers each procedure included in the plan and the location of any emergency or lifesaving equipment; and (B)  includes plan implementation exercises and emergency management skills; and (2)  assign to each camp staff member or volunteer specific responsibilities for implementing the plan. (e)  As soon as practicable but not later than 48 hours after the beginning of each camp session, youth camp staff shall conduct an age-appropriate emergency drill to ensure campers are familiar with evacuation routes and other procedures included in the camp's emergency operations plan and the location and appropriate use of any emergency or lifesaving equipment. (f)  A youth camp shall maintain in the camp's on-site administrative office records documenting the successful completion by each camp staff member, volunteer, and camper of the training and emergency drills required by Subsections (d) and (e). (g)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.